Idaho statutes. Title 9 EVIDENCE
Chapter 12
EXAMINATION OF WITNESSES

Sec.

§ 9-1201. Exclusion of adverse witnesses. [Repealed.]

§ 9-1202. Direct and cross-examination. [Repealed.]

§ 9-1203. Leading questions. [Repealed.]

§ 9-1204. Refreshment of memory. [Repealed.]

§ 9-1205. Rules governing cross-examination. [Repealed.]

§ 9-1206. Examination of adverse party. [Repealed.]

§ 9-1207. Impeachment of own witness. [Repealed.]

§ 9-1208. Reexamination and recalling witness. [Repealed.]

§ 9-1209. Impeachment by adverse party. [Repealed.]

§ 9-1210. Impeachment by showing inconsistent statements. [Repealed.]

§ 9-1211. Evidence of good character. [Repealed.]

§ 9-1212. Inspection of writing. [Repealed.]